Washington statutes.
RCW 36.58.100

Solid waste disposal district—Authorized—Boundaries—Powers—Governing body.

The legislative authority of any county with a population of less than one million is authorized to establish one or more solid waste disposal districts within the county for the purpose of providing and funding solid waste disposal services. No solid waste disposal district may include any area within the corporate limits of a city or town unless the city or town governing body adopts a resolution approving inclusion of the area within its limits. The county legislative authority may modify the boundaries of the solid waste disposal district by the same procedure used to establish the district. A solid waste disposal district may be dissolved by the county legislative authority after holding a hearing as provided in RCW 36.58.110.

As used in RCW 36.58.100 through 36.58.150 the term "county" includes all counties other than a county with a population of one million or more.

A solid waste disposal district is a quasi-municipal corporation, an independent taxing "authority" within the meaning of Article VII, section 1 of the state Constitution, and a "taxing district" within the meaning of Article VII, section 2 of the state Constitution.

A solid waste disposal district shall constitute a body corporate and shall possess all the usual powers of a corporation for public purposes as well as all other powers that may now or hereafter be specifically conferred by statute: PROVIDED, That a solid waste disposal district shall not have the power of eminent domain.

The county legislative authority shall be the governing body of a solid waste disposal district. The electors of a solid waste disposal district shall be all registered voters residing within the district.

[ 1991 c 363 s 75; 1982 c 175 s 1.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Captions not law—1991 c 363: See notes following RCW 2.32.180.

Severability—1982 c 175: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1982 c 175 s 9.]